District of Columbia statutes.
7-3010

Quality assurance for treatment providers.

Prior to implementing the Program, APRA shall:

(1)

Establish a Quality Assurance Division staffed with personnel to monitor the performance and quality of services of treatment providers;

(2)

Train quality assurance staff on the tools and protocols used to effectively monitor treatment providers; and

(3)

Develop policies, procedures, and instruments to measure qualitative and quantitative outcomes of treatment services.

July 18, 2000, D.C. Law 13-146, § 11, 47 DCR 4350